Alaska, session 34, SB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska enacted in sec. 4(a), ch. 30, SLA 06 2022, is amended to read: 07 (a) The Alaska Railroad Corporation is authorized to issue revenue bonds 08 under AS 42.40.250 to finance the replacement of the Alaska Railroad Corporation's 09 passenger dock and related terminal facility in Seward, Alaska, and associated costs, 10 including, without limitation, reserves for debt service and capitalized interest, if 11 necessary or appropriate, and costs of issuance. The replacement dock and terminal 12 facility must accommodate Alaska marine highway system vessels with side 13 loading doors. The maximum principal amount of bonds that the Alaska Railroad 14 Corporation may issue under this section is $135,000,000 [$60,000,000]. The Alaska 01 Railroad Corporation may issue the bonds in a single issuance or in several issuances, 02 without limitation as to number of issuances or timing, and as the Alaska Railroad 03 Corporation determines best furthers the purpose of financing the replacement of the 04 Alaska Railroad Corporation's passenger dock and related terminal facility in Seward, 05 Alaska, and associated costs. The bonds shall be repaid from dock revenue or other 06 funds available to the Alaska Railroad Corporation. The general credit of the Alaska 07 Railroad Corporation and the state may not be pledged for the repayment of the bonds. 08 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.